Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 12 Court Supervised Treatment Programs

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 145, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 5-12-101.
Court supervised
treatment.

Any district, juvenile,
circuit, municipal or tribal court judge or circuit court magistrate
may act as a participating judge in a court supervised treatment program
established pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 145, § 1.

§ 5-12-102.
Rules.

The Wyoming supreme court
may promulgate rules of practice for the participation of judges in
court supervised treatment programs.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 145, § 1.

§ 5-12-103.
Judicial
immunity.

A judge participating
in a court supervised treatment program shall be entitled to immunity
for actions taken in a court supervised treatment program to the same
extent the judge would be entitled to immunity for other actions performed
in accordance with law.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 145, § 1.